test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-h11_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # h_
    hús+N+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef: hús
    hús+N+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef: hús
    hús+N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef: húsi
    hús+N+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef: hús
    hús+N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef: hús
    hús+N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef: hús
    hús+N+Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef: húsum
    hús+N+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef: húsa
    hús+N+Neu+Sg+Nom+Def: húsið
    hús+N+Neu+Sg+Acc+Def: húsið
    hús+N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Def: húsinum
    hús+N+Neu+Sg+Gen+Def: húsins
    hús+N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Def: húsini
    hús+N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Def: húsini
    hús+N+Neu+Pl+Dat+Def: húsunum
    hús+N+Neu+Pl+Gen+Def: húsanna
